Utah statutes.
78B-3-306.   Arising without this state in favor of resident.

All transitory causes of action arising outside the state in favor of residents of this state shall be brought and tried in the county where the plaintiff resides, or in the county where the principal defendant resides.  If the principal defendant is a corporation, the action shall be brought in the county where the plaintiff resides or in the county where the corporation has an office or place of business.

